Utah statutes.
57-16-5.   Cause required for terminating lease -- Causes -- Cure periods -- Notice.

(1)  An agreement for the lease of mobile home space in a mobile home park may be terminated by mutual agreement or for any one or more of the following causes:

(a)  failure of a resident to comply with a mobile home park rule:

(i)  relating to repair, maintenance, or construction of awnings, skirting, decks, or sheds for a period of 60 days after receipt by a resident of a written notice of noncompliance from the mobile home park under Subsection 57-16-4.1(1); or

(ii)  relating to any other park rule for a period of seven days after the latter to occur of settlement discussion expiration or receipt by the resident of a written notice of noncompliance from the mobile home park, except relating to maintenance of a resident’s yard and space, the mobile home park may elect not to proceed with the seven-day cure period and may provide the resident with written notice as provided in Subsection (2);

(b)  repeated failure of a resident to abide by a mobile home park rule, if the original written notice of noncompliance states that another violation of the same or a different rule might result in forfeiture without any further period of cure;

(c)  behavior by a resident or any other person who resides with a resident, or who is an invited guest or visitor of a resident, that threatens or substantially endangers the security, safety, well-being, or health of other persons in the park or threatens or damages property in the park including:

(i)  use or distribution of illegal drugs;

(ii)  distribution of alcohol to minors; or

(iii)  commission of a crime against property or a person in the park;

(d)  nonpayment of rent, fees, or service charges for a period of five days after the due date;

(e)  a change in the land use or condemnation of the mobile home park or any part of it; or

(f)  a prospective resident provides materially false information on the application for residency regarding the prospective resident's criminal history.

(2)  If the mobile home park elects not to proceed with the seven-day cure period in Subsection (1)(a)(ii), a 15-day written notice of noncompliance shall:

(a)  state that if the resident does not perform the resident's duties or obligations under the lease agreement or rules of the mobile home park within 15 days after receipt by the resident of the written notice of noncompliance, the mobile home park may enter onto the resident's space and cure any default;

(b)  state the expected reasonable cost of curing the default;

(c)  require the resident to pay all costs incurred by the mobile home park to cure the default by the first day of the month following receipt of a billing statement from the mobile home park;

(d)  state that the payment required under Subsection (2)(b) shall be considered additional rent; and

(e)  state that the resident’s failure to make the payment required by Subsection (2)(b) in a timely manner shall be a default of the resident’s lease and shall subject the resident to all other remedies available to the mobile home park for a default, including remedies available for failure to pay rent.



Amended by Chapter 255, 2002 General Session

